Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0606.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 35. (1) The joint committee on administrative rules is created and consists of 5 members of the senate and 5 members of the house of representatives appointed in the same manner as standing committees are appointed for terms of 2 years. Of the 5 members in each house, 3 shall must be from the majority party and 2 shall must be from the minority party. The chairperson of the committee shall alternate alternates between houses each year. Members of the committee shall serve without compensation but shall must be reimbursed for expenses incurred in the business of the committee. The expenses of the members of the senate shall must be paid from appropriations to the senate and the expenses of the members of the house of representatives shall must be paid from appropriations to the house of representatives. The committee may meet during a session of the legislature and during an interim between sessions. The committee may hold a hearing on a rule transmitted to the committee, any rule previously filed with the secretary of state, or any other matter the committee considers appropriate. The committee must meet at the call of the chairperson of the committee or on the request of 1 or more members of the committee. Action by the committee, including action taken under section 52, shall must be by concurring majorities a concurrent majority of the members from each house. The committee shall report its activities and recommendations to the legislature at each regular session. (2) The committee may hire staff to assist the committee under this act. However, the supervision of staff, budgeting, procurement, and related functions of the committee shall must be performed by the council administrator under section 104a of the legislative council act, 1986 PA 268, MCL 4.1104a.